lexc/adj/enhuadjmely.lexc
! enhuadjmely.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid
+Ik
      
§J§ §JP§ 
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ 
§t§ §oeoez21§ §oooe2§ §oeoez24§ §AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§
§ooez23§ §uue2§ §EOA22§ §OEOE21§ §AE21§ §UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ 
§OEOE22§ §AE22§ §oeoebbmely§
§OEOE21fazek§ §oeoez17§ §oeoeadjoemely§ §JPJ§ 

LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefnum; ! empty string entry
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum1; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefnum1; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefnum1; ! empty string entry
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefigekoto ; ! empty string entry


LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adjige;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adjige;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adjige;
+Pref+:szembe   Adjige;
+Pref+:szerte   Adjige;
+Pref+:vissza   Adjige;
+Pref+:helyre   Adjige;
+Pref+:tovább   Adjige;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adjige;
+Pref+:észre   Adjige;
+Pref+:rajta   Adjige;
+Pref+:előre   Adjige;
+Pref+:félbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:félre   Adjige;
+Pref+:felül   Adjige;
+Pref+:fölül   Adjige;
+Pref+:agyon   Adjige;
+Pref+:ellen   Adjige;
+Pref+:körbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:körül   Adjige;
+Pref+:közbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:közre   Adjige;
+Pref+:külön   Adjige;
+Pref+:utána   Adjige;
+Pref+:végbe   Adjige;
+Pref+:végig   Adjige;
+Pref+:hátra   Adjige;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adjige;
+Pref+:egybe   Adjige;
+Pref+:ketté   Adjige;
+Pref+:össze   Adjige;
+Pref+:mellé   Adjige;
+Pref+:által   Adjige;
+Pref+:alul   Adjige;
+Pref+:haza   Adjige;
+Pref+:újra   Adjige;
+Pref+:abba   Adjige;
+Pref+:neki   Adjige;
+Pref+:bele   Adjige;
+Pref+:újjá   Adjige;
+Pref+:benn   Adjige;
+Pref+:fenn   Adjige;
+Pref+:fönn   Adjige;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adjige;
+Pref+:szét   Adjige;
+Pref+:tele   Adjige;
+Pref+:tova   Adjige;
+Pref+:meg   Adjige;
+Pref+:oda   Adjige;
+Pref+:elő   Adjige;
+Pref+:túl   Adjige;
+Pref+:alá   Adjige;
+Pref+:föl   Adjige;
+Pref+:ide   Adjige;
+Pref+:fel   Adjige;
+Pref+:rá   Adjige;
+Pref+:ki   Adjige;
+Pref+:le   Adjige;
+Pref+:el   Adjige;
+Pref+:át   Adjige;
+Pref+:be   Adjige;
            Adjige;

LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenegy       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkét       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhárom       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennégy       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenöt       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhat       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenhét       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizennyolc       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tizenkilenc       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billió       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:trillió       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:billiárd       Adjnum; ! optional article prefix
                        Adjnum; ! empty string entry


LEXICON Prefnum1
+Pref+:tizen       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszon       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adjnumik; ! optional article prefix
                        Adjnumik; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Adjnum
dekás AddAdja;
dimenzionális AddAdjat;
halmi AddAdja;
hatalmi AddAdja;
hónapi AddAdja;
kilónyi AddAdja;
napnyi AddAdja;
naponkénti AddAdja;
oldalnyi AddAdja;
szobányi AddAdja;
órai AddAdja;
órányi AddAdja;

LEXICON Adjnumik
harmadik AddAdja;
hatodik AddAdja;
nyolcadik AddAdja;

LEXICON AddAdjaEndnyi
0:i AddAdja;
0:nyi AddAdja; 

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdj
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase;

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmmely;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmmely;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fammely1;

Lexicon Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammely;


LEXICON Possmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;

LEXICON Adjige
aktívkodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
anyagiasodás AddAdjaEndnyi;
baktató AddAdjaEndnyi;
bodrosodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
bucskázás AddAdjaEndnyi;
búvároló AddAdjaEndnyi;
csavarítás AddAdjaEndnyi;
csíndúsodás AddAdjaEndnyi;
demokratizálódó AddAdjaEndnyi;
dobozosítás AddAdjaEndnyi;
dúdolás AddAdjaEndnyi;
ezüstgombosító AddAdjaEndnyi;
finomkodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
fordítgató AddAdjaEndnyi;
félbeszakítás AddAdjaEndnyi;
gondozatlanító AddAdjaEndnyi;
gázoló AddAdjaEndnyi;
hangsúlytalanító AddAdjaEndnyi;
heroikusodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
hunyózás AddAdjaEndnyi;
ideologizálás AddAdjaEndnyi;
ionizálódó AddAdjaEndnyi;
járulás AddAdjaEndnyi;
karavánozás AddAdjaEndnyi;
kollektivizáló AddAdjaEndnyi;
korcsosítás AddAdjaEndnyi;
kuporogó AddAdjaEndnyi;
központosító AddAdjaEndnyi;
lilásodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
légpárnásító AddAdjaEndnyi;
marjítás AddAdjaEndnyi;
moralizáló AddAdjaEndnyi;
méltányolás AddAdjaEndnyi;
numerikusodás AddAdjaEndnyi;
okkupáló AddAdjaEndnyi;
pacskolás AddAdjaEndnyi;
periferikusító AddAdjaEndnyi;
polyvásító AddAdjaEndnyi;
próbálkozó AddAdjaEndnyi;
raccsoló AddAdjaEndnyi;
retardálás AddAdjaEndnyi;
rugalmatlankodás AddAdjaEndnyi;
sikkasztás AddAdjaEndnyi;
stabilizálás AddAdjaEndnyi;
szalonnázó AddAdjaEndnyi;
szintetizáló AddAdjaEndnyi;
szupraszegmentálisodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
szótlanodás AddAdjaEndnyi;
tapintatlankodás AddAdjaEndnyi;
tokosító AddAdjaEndnyi;
trágyásító AddAdjaEndnyi;
táviratozás AddAdjaEndnyi;
utópikuskodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
viharozás AddAdjaEndnyi;
vágyató AddAdjaEndnyi;
zoopatológus AddAdjaEndnyi;
álmatagodó AddAdjaEndnyi;
önkorlátozódó AddAdjaEndnyi;
LEXICON Adj
acidofil AddAdj;
affin AddAdj;
agrárváros AddAdjaEndnyi;
allomorfit AddAdj;
alloploid AddAdj;
alulírt AddAdj;
alállomás AddAdjaEndnyi;
androgin AddAdj;
aneuploid AddAdj;
anglofil AddAdj;
antik AddAdj;
antropoid AddAdj;
asszír AddAdj;
astabil AddAdj;
aszalódás AddAdjaEndnyi;
avítt AddAdj;
azték AddAdj;
baskír AddAdj;
baszk AddAdjaEndnyi;
billiomodik AddAdj;
biocid AddAdj;
blazírt AddAdj;
bogumil AddAdj;
bongó AddAdjaEndnyi;
bornírt AddAdj;
bámész AddAdj;
bélyegalbum AddAdjaEndnyi;
crossbar AddAdjaEndnyi;
csálé AddAdj;
csíkászó AddAdjaEndnyi;
csóré AddAdj;
derék:derek AddAdj;
deutérium AddAdjaEndnyi;
diploid AddAdj;
diszperzoid AddAdj;
dublőr AddAdjaEndnyi;
ellipszoid AddAdj;
emberanyag AddAdjaEndnyi;
europid AddAdj;
facér AddAdj;
fakultatív AddAdjaEndnyi;
fasisztoid AddAdj;
fintorgóság AddAdjaEndnyi;
frankofil AddAdj;
froclizás AddAdjaEndnyi;
főmegbízott AddAdjaEndnyi;
gavallér AddAdj;
germanofil AddAdj;
gerontofil AddAdj;
grammatikus AddAdjaEndnyi;
gravid AddAdj;
gépház AddAdjaEndnyi;
hantmadár AddAdjaEndnyi;
haplodiploid AddAdj;
haploid AddAdj;
hellenofil AddAdj;
heterodin AddAdj;
heterofil AddAdj;
hexaploid AddAdj;
hipnotizmus AddAdjaEndnyi;
homonim AddAdj;
humanoid AddAdj;
huszadik AddAdj;
hátulsó AddAdjaEndnyi;
híg AddAdj;
istráng AddAdjaEndnyi;
kacér AddAdj;
kardioid AddAdj;
katalógus AddAdjaEndnyi;
konformábilis AddAdjaEndnyi;
kármin AddAdj;
képtár AddAdjaEndnyi;
linóleum AddAdjaEndnyi;
maszkulin AddAdj;
masztoid AddAdj;
maszturbáció AddAdjaEndnyi;
metalloid AddAdj;
milliomodik AddAdj;
milliárdodik AddAdj;
mohair AddAdj;
mongoloid AddAdj;
monoklin AddAdj;
monoploid AddAdj;
mordvin AddAdj;
moszlim AddAdj;
muszlim AddAdj;
mákgubó AddAdjaEndnyi;
második AddAdj;
negrofil AddAdj;
neolit AddAdj;
nonprofit AddAdj;
nyolcadikság AddAdjaEndnyi;
nyomorék AddAdj;
nyápic AddAdj;
nyírt AddAdj;
nápic AddAdj;
panteon AddAdjaEndnyi;
paranoid AddAdj;
piszlicsáré AddAdj;
pocsék AddAdj;
polaroid AddAdj;
poliploid AddAdj;
pottyantó AddAdjaEndnyi;
pucér AddAdj;
rapid AddAdj;
redukció AddAdjaEndnyi;
rheumathoid AddAdj;
romboid AddAdj;
russzofil AddAdj;
ruszin AddAdj;
sarkaló AddAdjaEndnyi;
smucig AddAdj;
spermatid AddAdj;
stereotip AddAdj;
szankszkrit AddAdj;
szankszrit AddAdj;
szegregáció AddAdjaEndnyi;
szferoid AddAdj;
szinuszoid AddAdj;
szumir AddAdj;
századik AddAdj;
századparancsnok AddAdjaEndnyi;
sík AddAdj;
sötétkármin AddAdj;
tengerililiom AddAdjaEndnyi;
termofil AddAdj;
termostabil AddAdj;
tolték AddAdj;
transzalpin AddAdj;
triploid AddAdj;
tádzsik AddAdj;
távolbalátó AddAdjaEndnyi;
varég AddAdj;
vezérsík AddAdjaEndnyi;
víg AddAdj;
zsidó AddAdjaEndnyi;
ökörfarkkóró AddAdjaEndnyi;
